Maryland, session 2026, SB0023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–862 and the part “Part VII. Short Title” of Article – Economic
Development of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 10–871
and the part “Part VIII. Short Title”.

SENATE BILL 23 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
PART VII. GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY FOR NONPROFITS LOAN
PROGRAM.
10–862.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BORROWER” MEANS A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT APPLIES AND
QUALIFIES FOR A LOAN UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY
FOR NONPROFITS LOAN FUND.
(D) “NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS
EXEMPT FROM FEDERAL INCOME TAX UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY
EFFICIENCY FOR NONPROFITS LOAN PROGRAM.
(F) “QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM” MEANS A SYSTEM THAT:
(1) GENERATES ELECTRICITY OR USABLE THERMAL ENERGY THAT IS
USED TO MEET ON–SITE DEMAND; AND
(2) ASSISTS THE STATE IN MEETING THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND
GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION GOALS UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
10–863.
THERE IS A GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY FOR NONPROFITS
LOAN PROGRAM IN THE CENTER.
10–864.
THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE IN
THE FORM OF NO–INTEREST LOANS TO NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS FOR:

SENATE BILL 23
(1) THE PLANNING, PURCHASE, AND INSTALLATION OF QUALIFYING
ENERGY SYSTEMS IN THE STATE; AND
(2) ACTIONS THAT IMPROVE ENERGY EFFICIENCY, SUCH AS
REPAIRING OR REPLACING WINDOWS, DOORS, AND HEATING, VENTILATION, AND
AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEMS AND OTHER SIMILAR IMPROVEMENTS.
10–865.
THE CENTER SHALL:
(1) MANAGE, SUPERVISE, AND ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM;
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ENSURE THAT LOANS PROVIDED TO
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS CARRY OUT THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(3) ATTACH TO ANY LOAN SPECIFIC TERMS THAT ARE CONSIDERED
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS FULFILLED.
10–866.
(A) (1) A BORROWER MUST FILE AN APPLICATION WITH THE CENTER TO
RECEIVE A LOAN UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE APPLICATION MUST BE SIGNED BY THE CHIEF OPERATING
OFFICER OR AN AUTHORIZED OFFICER OF THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
(B) THE APPLICATION MUST CONTAIN ANY INFORMATION THE CENTER
DETERMINES IS NECESSARY, INCLUDING:
(1) THE PROJECTED COST OF THE QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM,
ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION, OR TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE BEING FINANCED
THROUGH THE LOAN;
(2) THE LOCATION OF THE PROPERTY WHERE THE QUALIFYING
ENERGY SYSTEM WILL BE INSTALLED OR AN ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION WILL
OCCUR AND WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS OWNED OR LEASED BY THE APPLICANT;
AND
(3) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION RELATING TO THE BORROWER OR
THE PROPOSED QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION
BEING FINANCED THROUGH THE LOAN THAT MAY BE REQUIRED BY THE CENTER TO
ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 23 5
(C) THE CENTER MAY APPROVE AN APPLICATION FOR A LOAN SPECIFIED IN
§ 10–867(A)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE ONLY IF THE APPLICATION DEMONSTRATES THAT
THE PROPOSED QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION IS
ESTIMATED, BASED ON PROJECTED ENERGY COSTS, TO GENERATE ENERGY COST
SAVINGS OVER THE USEFUL LIFE OF THE SYSTEM OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION
THAT EQUAL OR EXCEED THE TOTAL AMORTIZED COST OF THE LOAN.
(D) IN APPROVING AN APPLICATION, THE CENTER SHALL CONSIDER AND
GIVE PRIORITY TO AN APPLICANT THAT HAS AN ANNUAL BUDGET OF $1,000,000 OR
LESS.
10–867.
(A) LOANS FROM THE FUND MAY BE USED FOR:
(1) THE PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF A QUALIFYING ENERGY
SYSTEM, INCLUDING ANY NECESSARY ANCILLARY MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, OR
FURNISHINGS;
(2) TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE PLANNING AND INSTALLATION
OF A QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM; AND
(3) ACTIONS THAT IMPROVE ENERGY EFFICIENCY, SUCH AS
REPAIRING OR REPLACING WINDOWS, DOORS, AND HEATING, VENTILATION, AND
AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEMS AND OTHER SIMILAR IMPROVEMENTS.
(B) EACH BORROWER FOR A LOAN UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL CONTRIBUTE AT LEAST 10% OF THE COST OF THE QUALIFYING
ENERGY SYSTEM OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION.
(C) (1) LOANS MADE UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL BE REPAYABLE BY
THE BORROWER IN ACCORDANCE WITH A SCHEDULE SET BY THE CENTER.
(2) THE SCHEDULE SET BY THE CENTER MAY BE ON A DEFERRED
PAYMENT BASIS.
(D) (1) A BORROWER SHALL PROVIDE ASSURANCES FOR THE
REPAYMENT OF A LOAN.
(2) THE ASSURANCES:
(I) SHALL INCLUDE A PROMISSORY NOTE; AND
(II) MAY INCLUDE A PLAN FOR REPAYMENT.

SENATE BILL 23
(E) LOANS MAY BE MADE IN CONJUNCTION WITH OR IN ADDITION TO
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED THROUGH OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL
PROGRAMS.
10–868.
(A) THERE IS A GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY FOR
NONPROFITS LOAN FUND.
(B) THE CENTER SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(C) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER CENTER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(D) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE PROGRAM;
(2) MONEY TRANSFERRED FROM THE STRATEGIC ENERGY
INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE;
(3) MONEY RECEIVED FROM ANY PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SOURCE;
(4) INTEREST AND INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(5) REPAYMENTS AND PREPAYMENTS ON LOANS MADE FROM THE
FUND.
(E) (1) IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 FOR THE FUND.
(2) IN FISCAL YEAR 2029, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION EQUAL TO AT LEAST $5,000,000 MINUS
THE AMOUNT IN THE FUND AS OF JUNE 30 OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
FISCAL YEAR.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY:
(1) TO PAY THE EXPENSES OF THE PROGRAM; AND

SENATE BILL 23 7
(2) TO PROVIDE LOANS TO ELIGIBLE BORROWERS UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER CENTER SHALL INVEST AND REINVEST
THE MONEY OF THE FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY HELD BY
THE CENTER MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE PAID INTO
THE FUND.
(3) ANY REPAYMENT ON LOANS MADE FROM THE FUND SHALL BE
PAID INTO THE FUND.
10–869. RESERVED.
10–870. RESERVED.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY
FOR NONPROFITS LOAN FUND.
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.

SENATE BILL 23
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment;
[and]
(14) TO PROVIDE FUNDS TO THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY
EFFICIENCY FOR NONPROFITS LOAN FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–868 OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE; AND
[(14)] (15) to pay the expenses of the Program.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2027, the
Maryland Clean Energy Center shall:
(1) establish an application process for loans made under the Green and
Renewable Energy Efficiency for Nonprofits Loan Program in Title 10, Subtitle 8 of the
Economic Development Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act;
(2) set guidelines and considerations for application, selection, and
repayment that include:
(i) nonprofit organizations that own, rather than rent, their
buildings;
(ii) property size and kilowatt–hours of energy used;
(iii) geographic diversity;
(iv) ethnic and racial diversity;
(v) economic diversity;
(vi) nonprofit organization mission diversity;
(vii) access to the borrower’s portion of the cost of the qualifying
energy system; and
(viii) process and frequency of loan repayment; and
(3) develop and implement an advertising campaign for the Green and
Renewable Energy Efficiency for Nonprofits Loan Program.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1 and 2 of this Act
shall take effect July 1, 2027.

SENATE BILL 23 9
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.